Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-154] Duties and authority of
officers. Each officer has the authority and shall perform the duties set
forth in the bylaws, or to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the duties
and authority prescribed in a resolution of the board or by direction of an
officer authorized by the board to prescribe the duties and authority of other
officers. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next